Arkansas, session 2025, HB1096.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - MEDICAL SERVICES - MEDICAID TOBACCO
SETTLEMENT PROGRAM. There is hereby established for the Department of Human
Services - Division of Medical Services - Medicaid Tobacco Settlement Program
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular
employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) G152C DHS PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1

*LCW005*
03-12-2025 15:38:19 LCW005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1096
SECTION 2. REGULAR SALARIES - AGING, ADULT, AND BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
SERVICES - MEDICAID TOBACCO SETTLEMENT PROGRAM. There is hereby established
for the Department of Human Services - Division of Aging, Adult, and
Behavioral Health Services - Medicaid Tobacco Settlement Program for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) L038C REGISTERED NURSE 1 GRADE MP01
(2) G129C DHS/DCO PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(3) M037C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS07
(4) M066C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY SPECIALIST 14 GRADE GS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 18

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - MEDICAL SERVICES - MEDICAID TOBACCO
SETTLEMENT PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Human
Services, to be payable from the Medicaid Expansion Program Account, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Human Services
- Division of Medical Services - Medicaid Tobacco Settlement Program for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $55,025
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 20,741
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 9,484
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 2,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $87,250

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - MEDICAL SERVICES - MEDICAID TOBACCO
03-12-2025 15:38:19 LCW005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1096
SETTLEMENT PROGRAM GRANTS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department
of Human Services, to be payable from the Medicaid Expansion Program Account,
for grant payments of the Department of Human Services - Division of Medical
Services - Medicaid Tobacco Settlement Program Grants for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) HOSPITAL AND MEDICAL SERVICES $140,426,470
(02) PRESCRIPTION DRUGS 5,142,643
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $145,569,113

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - AGING, ADULT, AND BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES
- MEDICAID TOBACCO SETTLEMENT PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Human Services, to be payable from the Medicaid Expansion
Program Account, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Department of Human Services - Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral
Health Services - Medicaid Tobacco Settlement Program for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $860,531
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 342,463
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 98,598
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,301,592

SECTION 6. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. ACCOUNTS.
Such appropriations and fund accounts as may be necessary to administer the
provisions of this act shall be established on the books of the Chief Fiscal
03-12-2025 15:38:19 LCW005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1096
Officer of the State, State Treasurer, and the Auditor of the State.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 7. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
POSITIONS. (a) Nothing in this act shall be construed as a commitment of the
State of Arkansas or any of its agencies or institutions to continue funding
any position paid from the proceeds of the Tobacco Settlement in the event
that Tobacco Settlement funds are not sufficient to finance the position.
(b) State funds will not be used to replace Tobacco Settlement funds when
such funds expire, unless appropriated by the General Assembly and authorized
by the Governor.
(c) A disclosure of the language contained in (a) and (b) of this Section
shall be made available to all new hire and current positions paid from the
proceeds of the Tobacco Settlement by the Tobacco Settlement Commission.
(d) Whenever applicable the information contained in (a) and (b) of this
Section shall be included in the employee handbook and/or Professional
Services Contract paid from the proceeds of the Tobacco Settlement.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 8. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
RESTRICTIONS. The appropriations provided in this act shall not be
transferred under the provisions of Arkansas Code 19-4-522, but only as
provided by this act.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 9. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFERS
OF APPROPRIATIONS. In the event the amount of any of the budget
classifications of maintenance and general operation in this act are found by
the administrative head of the agency to be inadequate, then the agency head
may request, upon forms provided for such purpose by the Chief Fiscal Officer
03-12-2025 15:38:19 LCW005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1096
of the State, a modification of the amounts of the budget classification. In
that event, he shall set out on the forms the particular classifications for
which he is requesting an increase or decrease, the amounts thereof, and his
reasons therefor. In no event shall the total amount of the budget exceed
either the amount of the appropriation or the amount of the funds available,
nor shall any transfer be made from the capital outlay or data processing
subclassifications unless specific authority for such transfers is provided
by law, except for transfers from capital outlay to data processing when
determined by the Division of Information Systems that data processing
services for a state agency can be performed on a more cost-efficient basis
by the Division of Information Systems than through the purchase of data
processing equipment by that state agency. In considering the proposed
modification as prepared and submitted by each state agency, the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State shall make such studies as he deems necessary. The Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State shall, after obtaining the approval of the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, approve the requested transfer
if in his opinion it is in the best interest of the state.
Upon determination by the Secretary of the Department of Human Services
that a Reallocation of Resources is necessary for the effective operation of
the Medicaid Tobacco Settlement Program Grants, the Secretary, with the
approval of the Governor, shall have the authority to request from the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State a transfer of Appropriation. This transfer
authority applies only to the Medicaid Tobacco Settlement Program Grants
appropriation section of this Act between the Hospital and Medical Services
line item and the Prescription Drugs line item. The limitation restrictions
applicable to the Department Reallocation of Resources authority applies to
this section.
The General Assembly has determined that the agency in this act could be
operated more efficiently if some flexibility is given to that agency and
that flexibility is being accomplished by providing authority to transfer
between certain items of appropriation made by this act. Since the General
Assembly has granted the agency broad powers under the transfer of
appropriations, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General
Assembly maintain oversight of the utilization of the transfers by requiring
prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee in the
utilization of the transfer authority. Therefore, the requirement of approval
03-12-2025 15:38:19 LCW005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1096
by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part
of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 10. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds authorized by this act
shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency and funds made
available by law for the support of such appropriations; and the restrictions
of the State Purchasing Law, the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures
Law, the Regular Salary Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors,
and other fiscal control laws of this State, where applicable, and
regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and Administration, as
authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in disbursement of said
funds.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 11. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General Assembly that any funds
disbursed under the authority of the appropriations contained in this act
shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for which this act was
adopted, as evidenced by Initiated Act 1 of 2000, the Agency Requests,
Executive Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the
budget manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration,
letters, or summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and
adoption.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 12. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
03-12-2025 15:38:19 LCW005

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1096
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee
























03-12-2025 15:38:19 LCW005